Kentucky statutes. TITLE XX Alcoholic Beverages
Local Option Elections
242.1292.
Licenses issued to limited sales precincts prior to July 14, 2022 — Regulatory license fee.

Any license issued by a state or local administrator under this section before July 14, 2022 shall:

Remain valid and in effect unless the license is surrendered to the department as authorized under KRS Chapters 241 to 244;

Continue to be subject to the regulatory license fee assessed under KRS

243.075

, and the jurisdiction that issued the license may continue to assess the regulatory license fee; and

Not count toward the total for any other city, county, or state license limits.

Notwithstanding any limitations imposed on the city’s taxing or licensing power by KRS

243.070

, for any city with a limited sale precinct established as wet territory under this section prior to July 14, 2022, the governing body of the city may continue to impose a regulatory license fee upon the gross receipts of each establishment located in said city licensed to sell alcoholic beverages.

The regulatory license fee may be levied at the beginning of each city budget period at the percentage rate reasonably estimated to fully reimburse the city for the estimated costs of any additional policing, regulatory, or administrative expenses related to the sale of alcoholic beverages in the city.

The regulatory license fee shall be in addition to any other taxes, fees, or licenses permitted by law, but a credit against the fee shall be allowed in an amount equal to any licenses or fees imposed by the city pursuant to KRS

243.070

.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1980, ch. 80, § 1, effective July 15, 1980; 2017 ch. 62, § 27, effective June 29, 2017; repealed and reenacted by 2022 ch. 104, § 1, effective July 14, 2022.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(7/15/98). This section was amended by 1998 Ky. Acts chs. 121 and 248. Where these Acts are not in conflict, they have been codified together. Where a conflict exists, Acts ch. 248, which was last enacted by the General Assembly prevails under KRS

446.250

.

242.1293.
Election in county with city of second class with prohibition for limited sale by the drink for on-premises consumption. [Repealed.]

242.1294.
Statement of proposition submitted in election. [Repealed]

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 432, § 7, effective June 17, 1978; 1980, ch. 188, § 227, effective July 15, 1980; 1982, ch. 360, § 69, effective July 15, 1982; repealed by 2022 ch. 104, § 6, effective July 14, 2022.

242.1295.
Licensing restrictions. [Repealed, reenacted, and amended.]

242.1296.
Requisites for subsequent elections. [Repealed]

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 432, § 9, effective June 17, 1978; 1984, ch. 111, § 113, effective July 13, 1984; repealed by 2022 ch. 104, § 6, effective July 14, 2022.

242.1297.
Election in a precinct in a city of the third class where the entire city is wet territory. [Repealed.]

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 248, § 2, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 435, § 5, effective July 14, 2000; 2013, ch. 121, § 19, effective June 25, 2013; Repealed, Acts 2014, ch. 92, § 314, effective January 1, 2015.

Compiler's Notes

This section (Enact. Acts
1998, ch. 248, § 2, effective July 15, 1998;
2000, ch. 435, § 5, effective July 14, 2000;
2013, ch. 121, § 19, effective June 25, 2013) was repealed by Acts
2014, ch. 92, § 314, effective January 1, 2015.

242.1298.
Moist territory resulting from a special limited local option election to remain dry except for specific type of sales authorized by the election proposition — Limited local option election to return moist territory to dry status at later date. [Repealed]

History.

Enact. Acts 2013, ch. 121, § 6, effective June 25, 2013; repealed by 2022 ch. 104, § 6, effective July 14, 2022.